Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB345.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 205 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "community intervener" means a trained service provider
who assists an individual who is deaf-blind to access communication,
environmental information, and community activities through tactile, visual,
auditory, or other individualized methods, for the purpose of supporting
independent living, self-determination, and full participation in home and
community-based settings.
(2) (a) If approved by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services,
community interveners shall be a recognized provider type within the
Michelle P. waiver program, and the Michelle P. waiver program shall
provide coverage for community intervener services for deaf-blind
individuals.
(b) The Department for Medicaid Services shall, within ninety (90) days after
receiving approval from the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services to cover community intervener services in the Michelle P. waiver
program, promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A to implement this section, including but not limited to:
1. Training and qualification requirements for community interveners;
2. The provider enrollment process for community interveners;
3. Services that community interveners are permitted to provide; and
4. Reimbursement rates for services provided by a community intervener.
Section 2. If the Cabinet for Health and Family Services or the Department for
Medicaid Services determines that a state plan amendment, waiver, or any other form of
authorization or approval from any federal agency to implement Section 1 of this Act is
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/26/2026 1:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1918
necessary to prevent the loss of federal funds or to comply with federal law, the cabinet
or department:
(1) Shall, within 90 days after the effective date of this section, request the
necessary federal authorization or approval to implement Section 1 of this Act; and
(2) May only delay implementation of the provisions of Section 1 of this Act for
which federal authorization or approval was deemed necessary until the federal
authorization or approval is granted.
Section 3. Sections 1 and 2 of this Act shall constitute the specific authorization
required under KRS 205.5372(1).
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/26/2026 1:52 PM Jacketed